Hawaii statutes.
§448-22 Prosecuting officers, duty. On
notice from any member of the board of dental examiners, the several
prosecuting officers of the State shall institute prosecutions for offenses
under this chapter. [L 1903, c 40, §16; RL 1925, §1082; RL 1935, §997; RL 1945,
§2169; RL 1955, §61-22; HRS §448-22]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next